Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-242
School lands; publication of notice; fees.

The publisher of any advertisement in connection with the forfeiture, leasing or sale of any educational lands shall be allowed the fees fixed by law for publishing legal notices, or standard commercial rates when the board elects to use commercial advertising.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 19, p. 310;

R.S.1913, § 5865;

Laws 1921, c. 80, § 3, p. 293;

C.S.1922, § 5201;

Laws 1927, c. 190, § 1, p. 545;

C.S.1929, § 72-221;

Laws 1933, c. 96, § 12, p. 391;

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 3, p. 701;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-221;

R.S.1943, § 72-242;

Laws 1947, c. 235, § 8, p. 750;

Laws 1974, LB 894, § 3.